Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 15.5
FORMAL REQUESTS FOR
CRIMINAL ACTIVITY INFORMATION
FROM PUBLIC UTILITIES

Section

16-15.5-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Life-threatening situation" means a circumstance in which a person is causing or has caused or is threatening to cause serious bodily injury to another person or persons, including a situation in which a person has taken another person or persons hostage.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 937, § 1, effective April 3.

16-15.5-102. Formal written request for information relating to specific criminal activity.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, upon a receipt of a formal written request for information about a particular individual in connection with a life-threatening situation made pursuant to this section by a chief of police, an elected district attorney, the state attorney general, a sheriff, or the director of the Colorado bureau of investigation, an authorized representative of a fixed public utility shall, as soon as possible, provide to the person making such request the following information about the individual named in the formal written request, including and limited to the name or names used, the address or addresses used, and the nonpublished number. Such requests shall be made during regular business hours, whenever practicable.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, if the need for information about a particular individual in connection with a life-threatening situation arises at a time other than regular business hours, a law enforcement officer listed in subsection (1) of this section or, if such officer is unavailable, the next officer in command, may orally request and obtain such information; except that a formal written request shall be submitted in accordance with subsection (1) of this section by the end of the next working day for the law enforcement agency.

A formal written request for information made pursuant to this section shall be returned to the district court for review in the judicial district within which the formal written request was made. Such return shall be made within seventy-two hours after the issuance of the formal written request for information.

The public utilities and local law enforcement agencies shall establish a procedure for obtaining information based on oral requests. A fixed public utility or authorized representative thereof which responds to a formal written or oral request made pursuant to this section shall not be liable to any person or entity for providing the information requested absent a showing of willful, wanton, or malicious intent.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 937, § 1, effective April 3.